Illinois, session 104th, SB3263.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Provenance Data Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning set forth in 8Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.9    "Capture device" means any device that can record 10photographic, audio, or video content, including, but not 11limited to, video and still photography cameras, mobile phones 12with built-in cameras or microphones, and voice recorders. 13    "Capture device manufacturer" means a person who produces 14a capture device for sale in this State. "Capture device 15manufacturer" does not include a person exclusively engaged in 16the assembly of a capture device from components produced by 17others.18    "Covered artificial intelligence tool provider" means a 19person or entity that creates, codes, or otherwise produces 20artificial intelligence that: (i) has over 1,000,000 monthly 21visitors world-wide or users on average over the preceding 2212-month period; (ii) is publicly accessible in this State; 23and (iii) generates, manipulates, or otherwise edits audio,   SB3263- 2 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1video, or image content.2    "Large online platform" means a public-facing social media 3platform, content sharing platform, messaging platform, 4advertising network, stand-alone search engine, or web browser 5that distributes content to users who did not create or 6collaborate in creating the content and that exceeded 72,000,000 unique monthly users during the preceding 12 months.8    "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership, 9sole proprietorship, or other legal entity.10    "Personal provenance data" means provenance data that 11contains either personal information or unique device, system, 12or service information that is reasonably capable of being 13associated with a particular user.14    "Provenance label" means a disclosure that is embedded in 15image, video, or audio content in a manner that is 16machine-readable.17    "Provenance label reading tool" means a software program, 18application, or other mechanism that reads a provenance label 19and allows a person to determine whether an image, video, or 20audio content was created or altered by a specific artificial 21intelligence provided by a covered artificial intelligence 22tool provider.23    "System provenance data" means provenance data that is not 24reasonably capable of being associated with a particular user 25and that contains information regarding the type of device, 26system, or service used to generate digital content or   SB3263- 3 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1information related to content authenticity. 2    Section 10. Requirements for covered artificial 3intelligence tool providers.4    (a) A covered artificial intelligence tool provider shall 5make available, at no cost to a person, a provenance label 6reading tool. The provenance label reading tool shall be made 7publicly accessible through a conspicuous link on the covered 8artificial intelligence tool provider's website and any 9corresponding mobile application. The provenance label reading 10tool shall allow a person to:11        (1) upload an image, video, text, or audio content; or12        (2) provide a uniform resource locator that links to 13    an image, video, text, or audio content.14    (b) The provenance label reading tool shall support access 15by an application programming interface that allows a person 16to programmatically submit content for assessment without 17accessing the covered artificial intelligence tool provider's 18website.19    (c) The provenance label reading tool shall provide a 20mechanism for a person to submit feedback regarding the tool's 21efficacy. A covered artificial intelligence tool provider 22shall consider and use this feedback to improve the provenance 23label reading tool.24    (d) A covered artificial intelligence tool provider shall 25not collect or retain any personal information from a person   SB3263- 4 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1who uses the provenance label reading tool, except that it may 2retain contact information voluntarily provided by a person 3who submits feedback in accordance with subsection (c). The 4provenance label reading tool shall not output any personal 5provenance data detected in the content.6    (e) A covered artificial intelligence tool provider shall 7not retain any content submitted to the provenance label 8reading tool for longer than is necessary to comply with this 9Act. 10    (f) A covered artificial intelligence tool provider shall 11include a provenance label in any image, video, or audio 12content instance created by its artificial intelligence. A 13provenance label required under this subsection shall:14        (1) be readable by the provenance label reading tool 15    required by this Section;16        (2) be, to the extent technically feasible, permanent 17    or extraordinarily difficult to remove;18        (3) convey, to the extent technically feasible, either 19    directly or through a link to a permanent website, the 20    following system provenance data:21            (A) the name of the covered artificial 22        intelligence tool provider;23            (B) the name and version number of the artificial 24        intelligence that created or altered the content;25            (C) the time and date of the content's creation or 26        alteration; and  SB3263- 5 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1            (D) a unique identifier of the content. 2    Section 15. Requirements for large online platforms.3    (a) A large online platform shall:4        (1) to the extent technically feasible, detect whether 5    any provenance label that is compliant with widely adopted 6    specifications adopted by an established standards-setting 7    body is embedded in or attached to content distributed on 8    the large online platform;9        (2) provide a mechanism to disclose any 10    machine-readable provenance label detected in content 11    distributed on the large online platform, which shall, in 12    a clear and conspicuous manner, indicate to a user that 13    provenance data is available; and14        (3) allow a user to inspect all available system 15    provenance data in an easily accessible manner, either 16    directly through the platform's user interface or by 17    providing a means for the user to download the content 18    with its attached system provenance data.19    (b) A large online platform shall not:20        (1) to the extent technically feasible, knowingly 21    strip any provenance label or system provenance data that 22    is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by 23    an established standards-setting body from content 24    uploaded to or distributed on the large online platform; 25    or  SB3263- 6 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1        (2) retain any personal provenance data from content 2    shared on the large online platform. 3    Section 20. Requirements for capture device manufacturers. 4With respect to any capture device that a capture device 5manufacturer first produces for sale in this State on or after 6the effective date of this Act, the capture device 7manufacturer, to the extent technically feasible and compliant 8with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established 9standards-setting body, shall:10        (1) provide a user with the option to include a 11    provenance label in content captured by the capture device 12    that conveys the following system provenance data:13            (A) the name of the capture device manufacturer;14            (B) the name and version number of the capture 15        device that created the content; and16            (C) the time and date of the content's creation;17        (2) embed the provenance label described in paragraph 18    (1) in content captured by the device by default;19        (3) clearly inform a user of the existence of settings 20    relating to the provenance label upon the user's first use 21    of a recording function on the capture device;22        (4) provide in the capture device's settings a clear 23    and accessible mechanism for a user to opt out of the 24    inclusion of a provenance label in the user's captured 25    content; and  SB3263- 7 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1        (5) ensure the capabilities required by this Section 2    are available for the capture device's default capture 3    application and are made available to third-party 4    applications that use the device's capture 5    functionalities. 6    Section 25. Third-party licensees and hosting platforms.7    (a) If a covered artificial intelligence tool provider 8licenses its artificial intelligence to a third party, the 9covered artificial intelligence tool provider shall require by 10contract that the licensee maintain the system's capability to 11include a provenance label as required by subsection (f) of 12Section 10.13    (b) If a covered artificial intelligence tool provider has 14actual knowledge that a third-party licensee has modified an 15artificial intelligence to remove its capability to include a 16provenance label, the covered artificial intelligence tool 17provider shall revoke the third party's license to use the 18artificial intelligence within 96 hours after obtaining the 19knowledge.20    (c) A third-party licensee whose license to use artificial 21intelligence is revoked under this Section shall not use the 22artificial intelligence after the revocation.23    (d) The operator of a website or application that makes 24available for download the source code or model weights of 25artificial intelligence shall not knowingly make available   SB3263- 8 -LRB104 19799 SPS 33249 b1artificial intelligence that does not place disclosures into 2content as required by subsection (f) of Section 10. 3    Section 30. Enforcement. 4    (a) A covered artificial intelligence tool provider, large 5online platform, or capture device manufacturer that violates 6this Act is liable for a civil penalty in an amount not to 7exceed $5,000 per violation.8    (b) A third-party licensee that violates subsection (c) of 9Section 25 may be subject to a civil action for injunctive 10relief.11    (c) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to 12enforce this Act and to collect civil penalties or seek 13injunctive relief. In any such action, the prevailing party 14may be awarded reasonable attorney's fees and costs. 15    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 16severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 181, 2027.